Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 4. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund.

§ 37.2-317.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Assets”
means the buildings and land of state facilities operated by the Department.

“Fund”
means the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund.

“Net proceeds”
means the gross amount received by the seller on account of the sale of any assets (i) less costs incurred on behalf of the seller in connection with such sale and (ii), if after the sale the sold assets will be used by an entity other than a state agency or instrumentality or a local governmental entity in a governmental activity and debt obligations financed any portion of the sold assets and any amount of such obligations is outstanding at the time of the sale, less the amount necessary to provide for the payment or redemption of the portion of such outstanding obligations that financed the sold assets, which amount shall be used to pay or redeem such obligations or shall be transferred to the third party issuer of the obligations for a use permitted in accordance with such obligations.

History.

2000, cc. 569, 606, § 2.1-812; 2001, c. 844, § 37.1-258; 2002, c. 803; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardaton and Substance Abuse Services Trust Fund” in the paragraph defining “Fund.”

§ 37.2-318.
Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund established; purpose.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund to enhance and ensure for the coming years the quality of care and treatment provided to individuals receiving public mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-1156

, the Fund shall consist of the net proceeds of the sale of vacant buildings and land held by the Department. The Fund shall also consist of such moneys as shall be appropriated by the General Assembly and any private donations. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2000, cc. 569, 606, § 2.1-813; 2001, c. 844, § 37.1-259; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardaton and Substance Abuse Services Trust Fund” near the beginning of the first sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving public mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services” for “consumers of public mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse services” at the end of the first sentence.

§ 37.2-319.
Administration of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund.

The Fund shall be administered by the Commissioner. Moneys in the Fund shall be used for mental health, developmental, or substance abuse services and to facilitate transition of individuals with intellectual disability from state training centers to community-based services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the net proceeds from the sale of any vacant buildings and land shall first be used to (i) deliver mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services within the same service area where the sold buildings and land were located to ensure the same level of mental health, developmental, and substance abuse services as before the sale and (ii) provide benefits pursuant to the Workforce Transition Act of 1995 (§

2.2-3200

et seq.) to those persons who were employees of the Commonwealth and, as a result of the sale, are no longer employed by the Commonwealth or are otherwise negatively affected by the sale.

For each fiscal year starting with the Commonwealth’s 2011-2012 fiscal year, any funds directed to be deposited into the Fund pursuant to the general appropriation act shall be appropriated for financing (i) a broad array of community-based services including but not limited to Intellectual Disability Home and Community Based Waiver services or (ii) appropriate community housing, for the purpose of transitioning individuals with intellectual disability from state training centers to community-based care.

History.

2000, cc. 569, 606, § 2.1-814; 2001, c. 844, § 37.1-260; 2005, c. 716; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2011, cc. 724, 729; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 724 and 729, cl. 2 provides: “At the direction of the Governor, the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall develop a plan to transition individuals with mental retardation from state training centers to community-based settings. The plan shall include provisions to reduce the number of individuals who are currently residing in state training centers and include provisions to (i) offer a broad array of community-based services including but not limited to Intellectual Disability Home and Community Based Waivers and (ii) address the availability of appropriate community housing. The plan shall also include facility specific objectives and timeframes to implement changes and shall be developed with input from individuals receiving training center services and their families, community services boards, private providers, and the Department of Medical Assistance Services. The Secretary shall submit the plan to the Governor and Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance by November 1, 2011. The Secretary shall submit reports on the development and implementation of the plan to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance on the first of July and December of each year beginning July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, cc. 724 and 729, cl. 3 provides: “For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2011, any funds directed to be deposited into the Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund pursuant to the general appropriation act shall be appropriated for the purpose of financing a broad array of community-based services, including up to 600 Intellectual Disability Home and Community Based Waiver slots, one-time transition costs for community placements, appropriate community housing, and other identified community services that may not be covered through the waiver program, for the purpose of transitioning individuals with mental retardation from state training centers to community-based settings.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 327 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding §

37.2-319

of the Code of Virginia, the Commissioner shall prepare a plan to address the capital and programmatic needs of other state mental health facilities and state mental retardation training centers when considering expenditures from the trust fund. No less than 30 days prior to the expenditure of funds, the Commissioner shall present an expenditure plan to the Chairmen of the Senate Finance and House Appropriations Committees for their review and consideration.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental Services Trust Fund” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardaton and Substance Abuse Services Trust Fund” in the section heading.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 724 and 729 are identical, and, in subsection A, inserted the subsection designator, rewrote the second sentence, inserted “pursuant to the Workforce Transition Act of 1995 (§

2.2-3200

et seq.)” preceding ”to those person who were employees of the Commonwealth” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “Benefits shall include appropriate transitional benefits”; and added subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “mental health, developmental,” for “mental illness, mental retardation” and “individuals with intellectual disability” for “individuals with mental retardation” in the first sentence, and “developmental” for “mental retardation” twice in clause (i) of the second sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “Community Based Waiver services” for “Community Based Waivers” in clause (i) and “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in clause (ii).